Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
STATEWIDE REGIONAL TRAINING OFFICE
SECTION 1. (1) The Statewide Regional Training Office is established within the  Depart-
ment of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(2) The office is under the supervision and  control of the Statewide Regional Training
Officer, who is responsible for the  performance of the duties, functions and powers of the
office.
(3) The Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and  Training shall appoint
the Statewide Regional Training Officer, who holds office at the pleasure of the director.
PROVISIONS RELATED TO THE STATE RESILIENCE OFFICER
SECTION 2. (1) The State Resilience Officer shall  identify state agencies with responsi-
bility for one or more emergency support functions identified by the  Federal Emergency
Management Agency.
(2) Each state agency identified under subsection (1) of this section shall designate an
employee of the  state agency as the Emergency Management Responsible Officer. The
Emergency Management Responsible Officer shall act  as the primary liaison between the
state agency and  state authorities related to emergency management, including the Oregon
Department of Emergency Management.
SECTION 3.  ORS 401.913 is amended to read:
401.913. (1) The office of State  Resilience Officer is created in the office of the Governor. The
office of State  Resilience Officer shall direct, implement and coordinate hazard safety and resilience
goal setting and state agency planning and preparation to improve hazard safety  and resilience, in-
cluding but not limited to  planning and preparation for safety and resilience during and after
earthquake, tsunami, wildfire, flooding and other natural or manmade events.
(2) The State Resilience Officer shall lead statewide efforts to implement the  Oregon Resilience
Plan, the Natural Hazard Mitigation Plan and other resilience plans adopted by the state.
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-B) Page 1
(3) The State Resilience Officer shall facilitate policy standardization among state agen-
cies, prioritize investments for improving resilience posture  and provide regular reports on
state agency resilience policy compliance, organizational preparedness,  continuity of
governance procedures and measures of emergency readiness. Such reports may be made  to
the Governor, appropriate committees of the Legislative Assembly or relevant public  safety
advisory boards and commissions.
[(3)] (4)  The State Resilience Officer shall lead executive branch agencies in continuity of op-
erations planning and continuity of government planning.
[(4)] (5) The Governor shall appoint an individual to serve  as the State Resilience Officer, sub-
ject to confirmation by the Senate pursuant to Article III, section 4, of the Oregon Constitution.
[(5)] (6) The legislative branch of government and the judicial branch of government shall  each
select an individual to monitor the effectiveness of hazard  safety and resilience planning in their
branch.
OREGON DISASTER RECOVERY AUTHORITY
SECTION 4. (1) The Oregon Disaster Recovery Authority is established as an advisory
group within the Office of  the Governor to direct emergency recovery in Oregon. The Gov-
ernor shall determine the membership of the authority, subject to subsection  (2) of this
section.
(2) The Governor shall appoint at least eight individuals  to serve as members of the au-
thority from among state agency leadership,  local emergency managers and others with ex-
pertise in emergency management. The Governor shall seek the advice of the Oregon
Homeland Security  Council when making appointments to the authority. Members of the
authority serve at the pleasure of the Governor.
(3) If the Governor declares a  state of emergency under ORS 401.165, the Governor may
activate the authority. The authority remains  activated until deactivated by order of the
Governor. The authority may remain activated notwithstanding the termination  of a state
of emergency.
(4) When activated, the authority shall:
(a) Coordinate initial crisis services;
(b) Coordinate recovery and mitigation efforts throughout this state, using  a framework
aligned with emergency support functions as defined by the Federal Emergency Management
Agency; and
(c) Coordinate the provision of emergency funding  and other aid to local governments
or private entities.
(5) A majority of the  members of the authority constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(6) Official action by the authority requires the approval of a majority of the  members
of the authority.
(7) The Governor shall appoint one  of the members of the authority to serve as chair-
person.
(8) The authority shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the Governor  or
the chairperson. The authority  may meet at times when the authority is not activated to
maintain readiness in the event of an emergency.
(9) The authority may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the authority.
(10) The Office of the Governor shall provide staff support to the authority.
(11) Members of the authority are not  entitled to compensation or reimbursement for
expenses and serve as volunteers on the authority.
(12) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the authority in the performance of the duties of the authority and, to  the extent permitted
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-B) Page 2
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
authority consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 5.
(1) If the Oregon  Disaster Recovery Authority established under section 4
of this 2026 Act is activated pursuant to a declaration of emergency, the Governor  may hire
additional state agency personnel under this section.
(2) Additional personnel hired under this section:
(a) May be placed at any state agency, including the Office of the Governor;
(b) Must perform duties related to the emergency, which may include taking over  duties
previously performed by other state agency personnel who  have been reassigned to
emergency-related tasks; and
(c) Must have their employment terminated no later than the date the  authority is de-
activated under section 4 of this 2026 Act.
(3) Notwithstanding any other  law relating to state government employment, additional
personnel hired under this section may be recruited and selected through any means the
Governor deems appropriate.
(4) The Governor’s hiring  authority under this section is subject to the availability of
funding. The compensation of additional personnel hired under this section may be paid  from
the Oregon Disaster Recovery Authority Fund established under section 6 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 6.
The Oregon Disaster Recovery Authority Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. The Oregon Disaster  Recovery Au-
thority Fund consists of moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred  to the fund
by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise. Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated
to the Office of  the Governor to pay for compensation for personnel hired under section 5
of this 2026 Act.
OREGON PREPAREDNESS GRANT ACCOUNT
SECTION 7. The Oregon Preparedness Grant Account is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. The Oregon Preparedness Grant Account
consists of moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred  to the fund by the Leg-
islative Assembly or otherwise. Moneys in  the account are continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Department of Emergency Management for providing  grants to local governments,
as defined in ORS 174.116, and tribal governments to support  their compliance with ORS
401.305 (2).
ODEM DUTIES
SECTION 8.  ORS 401.114 is amended to read:
401.114. The Oregon Department of Emergency Management shall carry out the  following func-
tions:
(1) Coordinate emergency management functions on a regional basis within this state;
(2) Coordinate training related to emergency response on a regional  basis  within this state;
[and]
(3) Develop and carry out emergency preparedness exercises on a statewide basis[ .];
(4) Oversee collaboration, cooperation and coordination between the state and  organiza-
tions involved in the emergency  stockpile plan described in ORS 401.111, the emergency
preparedness equipment grant program described in ORS 401.551 and other stockpile  or
emergency preparedness programs carried out by state agencies;
(5) Take actions as necessary to ensure that supplies, equipment and other materials are
appropriately staged in preparation for emergencies; and
(6) Develop and maintain an inventory plan for the sustainable procurement, rotation and
management of emergency preparedness assets.
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-B) Page 3
RESILIENCE HUBS AND NETWORKS
SECTION 9.  ORS 409.760 is amended to read:
409.760. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Resilience  Hub” means a physical facility that is  created,  operated, managed or supported
by one or more local residents, local governments, tribal governments, public schools, community-
based organizations, faith-based organizations,  nonprofit organizations , [ or] nongovernmental organ-
izations or any other groups or entities located in Oregon,  and that:
(A) Supports the needs of community members  or tribal communities, facilitates gathering and
communication, distributes resources and otherwise enhances quality of life within a community;
(B) Serves  as a central point for gathering, information sharing, and coordination in response
to a disruption in the community;
(C) Enhances the ability of a community to respond to and recover from a disruption in  a com-
munity;
(D) Is positioned, operated and resourced on a day-to-day basis , during a disruption and during
recovery, to  provide community resources, including but not limited to food, water, information
exchange, electronic charging stations, basic medical supplies and equipment proportionate  to the
size of the community’s population and needs;
(E) Supports community cache sites and other support for community members  who shelter in
place;
(F) Can provide child care, training, food distribution  and other services that can help a com-
munity respond to unmet [ social] needs to prepare for, respond to  and recover from adverse events,
emergencies or  disasters;
(G) Can provide, or can be retrofitted to provide, heating, cooling, air filtration and  weather
protection; and
(H) Accommodates individuals with accessibility needs.
(b) “Resilience Network” means an association  of facilities, organizations, resource providers
or service providers [ outside of a physical Resilience Hub facility that collectively serve  the purposes
of a Resilience Hub ] that collectively supports community members to  prepare for, adapt to
or respond to social, emotional and physical disruption generated by ongoing  climate change
or other causes, and during and after an adverse event, emergency or disaster .
(2) The Department of Human Services shall, in consultation with  the State Department of En-
ergy and the Oregon Health Authority, provide grants, [ support and technical assistance for ] equip-
ment, technical assistance, contracted services and any other  type of support to individuals
or organizations located in Oregon for creating or  sustaining  Resilience Hubs and Resilience
Networks in Oregon. The Department of Human Services shall award:
(a) Grants for expenses related to planning  and organizing Resilience Hubs and Resilience
Networks;
(b) Grants to support and expand  development and operation of Resilience Hubs and Resilience
Networks to ensure that physical facilities can provide  protection from extreme weather, can
maintain power and  climate during power outages, have auxiliary communications capabilities and
are resilient following earthquakes,  fires, tornadoes, floods, other extreme weather events and other
potential adverse events, emergencies or  disasters[ , emergencies or incidents ]; and
(c) Grants for  resources and services needed by communities to otherwise prepare for and re-
spond to adverse events, emergencies or  disasters.
(3) Individuals or organizations located in Oregon and serving people in this state  may apply
for grants by submitting an application that must include:
(a) A description of the purposes for  which grant moneys will be expended , including a de-
scription of the services to be provided to  the community by the Resilience Hub or Resilience
Network;
(b) A plan for implementing specific strategies to build resilience in a community;
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-B) Page 4
(c) A description of additional resources available for purposes of the  Resilience Hub or
Resilience Network;
(d) A  description of the project’s ability to serve vulnerable populations and communities tradi-
tionally underrepresented in the public process, including communities  of color, communities expe-
riencing lower incomes, tribal communities, rural communities, coastal  communities, communities
with limited infrastructure, seniors, youth and persons with disabilities; and
(e) Any other information required by the department.
(4) The department shall execute grant agreements with grant  recipients obligating recipients
to use grant moneys for purposes specified in the grant agreements.  The department, in consultation
with the State  Department of Energy and the Oregon Health Authority, shall determine the per-
missible purposes , applicant eligibility requirements, types of awards  for a grant  and eligible
equipment, technical assistance, services and support  under this section  based on the needs of
the Resilience Hub or Resilience Network. The department shall determine the needs of the
Resilience Hub or Resilience Network in consultation with  the community, including populations
described in subsection (3)(d) of  this section, within the locality in which the Resilience Hub or
Resilience Network operates.
(5) The Department of Human Services shall adopt rules necessary for  the administration of this
section, including specifying the form and contents of an application for a grant under this section.
OVERNIGHT TRAINING ACTIVITIES
SECTION 10.
Notwithstanding any other provision of state or local law, a facility that is
used for  emergency preparedness, response or recovery and that receives state funding is
authorized to host overnight training activities.
COUNTY AUTHORITY TO WAIVE CIVIL PENALTIES
SECTION 11. A county governing body may, by order or resolution, waive a  civil penalty
imposed by the Oregon Health Authority or a local health authority under ORS 624.992 if the
civil penalty is imposed for a violation that occurred during a state of emergency  declared
under ORS 401.165.
DEPARTMENT OF THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL
SECTION 12. The Department of the State Fire  Marshal shall conduct a study of health
coverage disparities between paid and volunteer firefighters. The department shall submit a
report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legis-
lation, to  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to emergency man-
agement no later than September 15, 2027.
SECTION 13.
Section 12 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
FINGERPRINTING BY ODEM
SECTION 14. The Oregon Department of  Emergency Management shall require the
fingerprints of the  following persons for the purpose of requesting a state or nationwide
criminal records check under ORS 181A.195:
(1) Persons employed or applying for employment by the department; and
(2) Persons who provide  or seek to provide services to the department as a contractor
or subcontractor.
PUBLIC AND INDIVIDUAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-B) Page 5
SECTION 15. Sections 16 to 19 of this 2026 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS
chapter 401.
SECTION 16. (1) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management shall establish and
administer a state infrastructure emergency recovery grant program, to be  known as the
Oregon Public Assistance Grant  Program, to issue grants to qualified recipients, subject to
available funding.
(2) Grants under the program must be used to pay for work  performed before, during or
after an emergency  to protect public health, safety or property, including, without limitation,
debris removal and work to protect or restore public services or public infrastructure.
(3) The Governor may activate the program if:
(a) The Governor determines that an emergency has occurred or is  imminent and finds
that assistance from the state is warranted; and
(b) The department recommends that the program be activated.
(4) The Governor shall inactivate  the program when the Governor finds that assistance
from the state is no longer warranted.
(5) While the program is active, the department may issue  grants to qualified recipients
pursuant to requests from counties or tribal entities.  A request on behalf of a city may be
made by the county in  which a geographic majority of the city lies. Requests must be in
writing and must include the following information:
(a) Confirmation that the requester has  taken appropriate action under the local emer-
gency plan;
(b) An estimate of the  amount and severity of damages and losses and a description of
the impact of the emergency on the public and private sectors;
(c) A description of the nature and amount of local resources  which have been or will
be committed to alleviate the results of the emergency;
(d) A preliminary estimate of the types and amount of supplementary  state emergency
assistance needed; and
(e) A certification by the requester  that the obligations and expenditures for the current
emergency will comply  with all applicable cost sharing requirements agreed between the de-
partment and the requester.
(6) The department may adopt rules to administer and implement the provisions of  this
section, including rules governing  eligibility requirements, the form and manner of requests
and evaluation of requests by the department.
(7) As used in this section, “qualified recipient” means:
(a) A state agency;
(b) A local government;
(c) A federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon;
(d) A school district or education service district; and
(e) A nonprofit organization that provides critical services or essential social  services,
such as a hospital, long term care  facility, school, community center, food assistance pro-
gram or shelter.
SECTION 17.
The Oregon Public Assistance Grant Program Account is established in  the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the  General Fund. Interest earned by the account
must be credited  to the account. The account consists of moneys appropriated, allocated,
deposited or transferred to the  account by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise and inter-
est earned on moneys in the  account. The moneys in the account are continuously appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Emergency Management to carry out the  Oregon
Public Assistance Grant Program described in section 16 of  this 2026 Act. The department
shall ensure that no more than 10  percent of the moneys in the account are used to pay
costs of coordination and distribution of assistance under the program.
SECTION 18. (1) The Department of  Human Services shall establish and administer an
individual grant program, to be known as  the Oregon Individual Assistance Grant Program,
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-B) Page 6
to issue grants to address critical emergency-related  needs of qualified individuals, subject
to available funding.
(2) The Governor may activate the program if:
(a) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management  recommends that the program
be activated, the Governor determines that an emergency has occurred or is imminent and
the Governor finds that assistance from the state is warranted; or
(b) The Governor has declared an emergency under ORS 401.165.
(3) The Governor shall inactivate  the program when the Governor finds that assistance
from the state is no longer warranted.
(4) While the program is active, the Department of Human  Services may issue grants
pursuant to requests from counties or tribal entities.  A request on behalf of a city may be
made by the county in  which a geographic majority of the city lies. Requests must be in
writing and must include the following information:
(a) Confirmation that the requester has  taken appropriate action under the local emer-
gency plan;
(b) An estimate of the  amount and severity of damages and losses and a description of
the impact of the emergency on individuals and households;
(c) A description of the nature and amount of local resources  which have been or will
be committed to alleviate the results of the emergency; and
(d) A preliminary estimate of the types and amount of supplementary  state emergency
assistance needed.
(5) Grants under the program may be used only to pay for:
(a) The provision of services  to qualified individuals for critical emergency-related needs,
which may include, without limitation:
(A) Temporary rental assistance;
(B) Hazard mitigation assistance;
(C) Repair or  replacement of owner-occupied homes that serve as a primary residence,
including repair or replacement of privately owned access routes;
(D) Assistance with immediate needs;
(E) Essential personal property assistance;
(F) Assistance with other serious needs that are not covered by insurance; and
(G) Other critical emergency recovery services as approved by the  Oregon Department
of Emergency Management; and
(b) Agreements with local governments, tribal entities or disaster recovery  organizations
for the delivery of services described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection, including payments
for staffing or other administrative needs.
(6) Assistance to individuals may be in the form of  direct financial assistance or pay-
ments to another entity on behalf of individuals.
(7) The Department of Human Services, in consultation with the Oregon Department  of
Emergency Management, may adopt  rules to administer and implement the provisions of this
section.
(8) The  Oregon Department of Emergency Management, in consultation with the De-
partment of Human Services, shall update the statewide emergency  management plan pre-
pared under ORS 401.052 to  incorporate the Oregon Individual Assistance Grant Program
into statewide disaster response and recovery planning. The plan must include,  without lim-
itation, provisions for equitable  distribution of assistance, coordination with local govern-
ments and community-based  organizations, and integration with federal recovery programs
when applicable.
(9) As used in this section:
(a) “Hazard mitigation” means actions taken to reduce impacts of future emergencies.
(b) “Immediate need” means:
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-B) Page 7
(A) A life-saving or life-sustaining item or activity that is essential to  prevent, mitigate
or overcome an adverse condition caused by an emergency; and
(B) Other equipment that is essential for daily household needs.
(c) “Qualified individual” means:
(A) An  individual who is displaced by an emergency from the individual’s primary resi-
dence;
(B) An individual whose primary  residence is rendered uninhabitable by an emergency;
or
(C) An individual with a disability whose primary residence is rendered inaccessible or
uninhabitable to the individual as a result of damage caused by an emergency.
SECTION 19.
The Oregon Individual Assistance Grant Program Account is established in
the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by  the
account must be credited to the account.  The account consists of moneys appropriated, al-
located, deposited or transferred to the account by the  Legislative Assembly or otherwise
and interest earned on moneys  in the account. The moneys in the account are continuously
appropriated to the  Oregon Department of Emergency Management. The department may
make moneys in the account available to the Department  of Human Services to carry out
the Oregon Individual Assistance Grant Program described in section 18 of this 2026 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 20. The unit captions  used in this 2026 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
Passed by House March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-B) Page 8